Nevada, session 83, SB134.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services the
sum of $5,000,000 for the awarding of grants in accordance with
subsection 2.
2. The Department of Health and Human Services shall
allocate the money appropriated by subsection 1 to an eligible
nonprofit organization selected by the Department to award grants
to local governments in this State for the purpose of purchasing
bundles of medical debt on secondary markets or directly from
health care providers with the goal of abolishing medical debt for a
group or groups of patients.
3. Upon acceptance of the money appropriated by subsection 1,
the nonprofit organization selected by the Department agrees to:
(a) Develop an application process for a local government to
apply for a grant.
-
*SB134*

– 2 –
(b) Establish eligibility guidelines for the award of grants that
prioritize medical debt relief for patients who are experiencing
financial hardship.
(c) Ensure that medical debt that is discharged using the money
appropriated by subsection 1 is discharged in a manner that does not
result in adverse tax implications for patients.
(d) Subject to the participation of local governments, ensure
grants are geographically distributed across the State.
(e) Prepare and transmit a report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before December 18, 2026, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by the nonprofit
organization through December 1, 2026.
(f) Prepare and transmit a final report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before September 17, 2027, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by the nonprofit
organization through June 30, 2027; and
(g) Upon request of the Legislative Commission, make available
to the Legislative Auditor any of the books, accounts, claims,
reports, vouchers or other records of information, confidential or
otherwise, of the nonprofit organization, regardless of their form or
location, that the Legislative Auditor deems necessary to conduct an
audit of the use of the money appropriated by subsection 1.
4. The nonprofit organization shall not expend more than 5
percent of the money appropriated by subsection 1 for the
administrative expenses of the nonprofit organization related to
awarding grants pursuant to this section.
5. The nonprofit organization may establish minimum and
maximum amounts that will be awarded and utilize other relevant
criteria in making grants in accordance with this section.
6. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
7. As used in this section, “eligible nonprofit organization”
means an organization which qualifies as tax exempt pursuant to
section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code and that is experienced
in locating, acquiring and relieving medical debt for natural persons.
-
*SB134*

– 3 –
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB134*